Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 8. Credit Card Fraud

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Credit card issuer's liability, under state laws, for wrongful billing, cancellation, dishonor or disclosure, 53 ALR4th 231.

Who is a “consumer” entitled to protection of state deceptive trade practice and consumer protection acts, 63 ALR5th 1.

21 C.J.S. Credit Reporting Agencies; Consumer Protection §§ 32 to 36, 65; 36A C.J.S. Forgery § 36; 52A Larceny § 3(7); 47 C.J.S. Interest and Usury; Consumer Credit §§ 348 to 351.

§ 6-3-801.
“Credit card” defined.

As used in this article:

“Credit card” means an identification card or device issued by a business organization authorizing the person to whom issued to purchase or obtain property or services on credit.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (a)(ii) or subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited

in

Hutchins v. State, 483 P.2d 519,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 1971).

Quoted

in

Temen v. State, 2009 WY 25, 201 P.3d 1139,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Feb. 24, 2009).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-3-802.
Unlawful use of credit card; penalties.

A person is guilty of unlawful use of a credit card if, with the intent to obtain property or services by fraud, he:

Uses a credit card, or the number or description of a credit card, issued to another person without the consent of that person;

Uses a credit card which he knows has been revoked, cancelled or expired; or

Knowingly uses a falsified, mutilated or altered credit card or the number or description thereof.

Unlawful use of a credit card is:

A misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if the value of the property or services purchased or obtained is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00); or

Repealed by Laws 1984, ch. 44, § 3.

A felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, if the value of the property or services purchased or obtained in violation of this section within any sixty (60) day period in the state of Wyoming totals one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or more in the aggregate.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1984, ch. 44, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 126, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (b)(i) and (iii), substituted “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)” for “five hundred dollars ($500.00).”

Credit card fraud statute did not preclude conviction under forgery statute.

Hutchins v. State, 483 P.2d 519,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 213

(Wyo. 1971).

Defendant properly charged with forgery and attempted forgery,not credit card fraud. —

See Alonso v. State, 712 P.2d 355,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 446

(Wyo. 1986).

Priorforgery conviction admissible. —

Defendant's convictions for robbery and misdemeanor credit card fraud in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 6-2-401(a)(i) and 6-3-802(a)(i) and (b)(iii) were appropriate because defendant's prior forgery conviction was admissible under Wyo. R. Evid. 404(b) to show that his use of the credit card was intentional and not the result of mistake or accident. The prior crime was also committed less than a year before the instant crime and defendant intended to deny any knowledge that the credit card was stolen or that he was otherwise involved in any of the crimes for which he was charged.
Temen v. State, 2009 WY 25, 201 P.3d 1139,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2009).

Quoted

in

Martindale v. State, 2001 WY 52, 24 P.3d 1138,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Criminal liability for unauthorized use of credit card, 24 ALR3d 986.

Successful negotiation of commercial transaction as element of state offense of credit card fraud or false pretense in use of credit card, 106 ALR5th 701.

What constitutes violation of § 134 of Consumer Credit Protection Act (15 USC § 1644), prohibiting fraudulent use of credit card, 72 ALR Fed 65.

§ 6-3-803.
Unlawful skimming of credit, debit or other electronic payment cards; penalties.

As used in this section:

“Authorized card user” means any person with the empowerment, permission or competence to act in the usage of any electronic payment card including, but not limited to, a credit card, charge card, debit card, hotel key card, stored value card or any other card that allows the user to obtain, purchase or receive goods, services, money or anything else of value from a merchant;

“Electronic payment card” means a credit card, charge card, debit card, hotel key card, stored value card or any other card that is issued to an authorized card user and that allows the user to obtain, purchase or receive goods, services, money or anything else of value from a merchant;

“Merchant” means an owner or operator of any retail mercantile establishment or his agent, employee, lessee, consignee, officer, director, franchisee or independent contractor who receives from an authorized user of an electronic payment card, or someone the person believes to be an authorized user, an electronic payment card or information from an electronic payment card, or what the person believes to be an electronic payment card or information from an electronic payment card, as the instrument for obtaining, purchasing or receiving goods, services, money or anything else of value from the person;

“Re-encoder” means an electronic device that places encoded information from the magnetic strip or stripe of an electronic payment card onto the magnetic strip or stripe of a different electronic payment card;

“Scanning device” means a scanner, reader or any other electronic device that is used to access, read, scan, obtain, memorize or store, temporarily or permanently, information encoded on the magnetic strip or stripe of an electronic payment card.

A person is guilty of unlawful skimming if the person uses:

A scanning device to access, read, obtain or memorize, temporarily or permanently, information encoded on the magnetic strip or stripe of an electronic payment card without the permission of the authorized user of the electronic payment card, with the intent to defraud the authorized user, the issuer of the authorized user’s electronic payment card or a merchant;

A re-encoder to place information encoded on the magnetic strip or stripe of an electronic payment card onto the magnetic strip or stripe of a different card without the permission of the authorized user of the card from which the information is being re-encoded, with the intent to defraud the authorized user, the issuer of the authorized user’s electronic payment card or a merchant.

Unlawful skimming is a felony:

Punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, for a first conviction;

Punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00), or both, for a second or subsequent conviction.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 166, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 166, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.